csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cnj_aw.yaml
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagosiiwaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagowaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: mikawisiiwegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: mikawiwegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: mikawisiiwanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: mikawiwanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawisiiwaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawiwaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawisiigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: mikaagoosiiwaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: mikaagoowaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagosiwaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagoyaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: mikawisiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: mikawiyeg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: mikawisiwan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: mikawiyan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawisigwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawiwaad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawisig
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: mikaagoosiwaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: mikaagooyaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagosiwaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagoyaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: mikawisiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: mikawiyegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: mikawisiwamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: mikawiyamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawisigwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawiwaapan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawisigoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawipan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: mikaagoosiwaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: mikaagooyaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagosiiwegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagowegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: mikoosinowagoogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: mikoonagoogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: mikaagoosiiwegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: mikaagoowegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: mikaagoosiiwanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: mikaagoowanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: mikoosiinogwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: mikoonogwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: mikaagoosiiwegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: mikaagoowegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagosiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagoyeg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: mikoosinowagog
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: mikoonagog
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: mikoosinowegwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: mikoonegwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: mikoosinoweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: mikooneg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: mikaagosiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: mikaagooyeg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: mikaagoosiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: mikaagooyeg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagosiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagoyegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: mikoosinowagoogoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: mikoonagoogoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: mikaagoosiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: mikaagooyegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: mikaagoosiwamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: mikaagooyamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: mikoosinokwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: mikaakwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: mikaagoosiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: mikaagooyegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagosiiwanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagowanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: mikoosiinowaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: mikoonowaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: mikoosiinowegwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: mikoonowegwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: mikoosiinowegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: mikoonowegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: mikoosiinogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: mikoonogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: mikaagoosiiwanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: mikaagoowanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagosiwan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagoyan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: mikoosinowaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: mikoonaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: mikoosinokwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: mikaakwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: mikoosinok
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: mikaak
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: mikaagoosiwan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: mikaagooyan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: mikaagoosiwan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: mikaagooyan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagosiwamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagoyamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: mikoosinowaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: mikoonaambaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: mikoosinowegwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: mikoonegwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: mikoosinowegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: mikoonegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: mikoosinokiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: mikaakiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: mikaagoosiwamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: mikaagooyamban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagosiiwaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagowaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawagwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawaawagwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawegwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawaawegwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawadwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawaawadwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagosiiwaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagowaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawangidwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: mikawaawangidwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawangwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: mikawaawangwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawindwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: mikawaawindwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagosigwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagowaad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwagwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawagwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwegwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawegwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwadwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawadwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagosigwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagowaad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwangidwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: mikawangidwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwangwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: mikawangwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiwindwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: mikawindwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagosigwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagowaapan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwagwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawagwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwegwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawegwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwadwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawadwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagosigwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagowaapan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwangidwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: mikawangidwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwangwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: mikawangwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiwindwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: mikawindwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagosiinigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagonigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawagen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawagen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawaden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawaden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasiwaawaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaawaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasiigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawinden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawinden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagosinig
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagonid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwag
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimag
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimeg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasigwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaawaad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasig
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwind
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimind
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagosinigoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagonipan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwagiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimagiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimegiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwadiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimadiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasigwaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaawaapan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasigoban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaapan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimangidiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimangiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwindiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimindiban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagosiigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagogwen
